Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.new text end new text begin (a) The legislature finds that sex trafficking has moved from the street corner to the smartphone, which means that making websites that facilitate human trafficking and prostitution inaccessible by default on Internet-enabled devices will curb the demand for these offenses more than any other measure since the inception of the Internet. Live adult entertainment establishments contribute to a culture that tolerates the sexual objectification and exploitation of women, and contribute to the need for community-based services to respond to victims of all forms of sexual exploitation, including sexual harassment, trafficking, and sexual assault. Crime statistics show that the presence of adult entertainment establishments may result in an increase in prohibited secondary sexual activities, such as prostitution, and other crimes in the surrounding community. new text end new text begin (b) The legislature is generally opposed to online censorship unless the content is injurious to children or promotes human trafficking. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [609.285] TITLE. new text end new text begin Sections 609.285 to 609.2857 shall be known and may be cited as the "Human Trafficking and Child Exploitation Prevention Act." new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [609.2851] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Generally. new text end new text begin For the purposes of sections 609.285 to 609.2857, the terms in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Adult entertainment establishment. new text end new text begin "Adult entertainment establishment" has the meaning given in section 617.242, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Cellular telephone. new text end new text begin "Cellular telephone" means a communication device containing a unique electronic serial number that is programmed into its computer chip by its manufacturer and whose operation is dependent on the transmission of that electronic serial number, along with a mobile identification number, which is assigned by the cellular telephone carrier, in the form of radio signals through cell sites and mobile switching stations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Child pornography. new text end new text begin "Child pornography" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 18, section 2256. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Computer. new text end new text begin "Computer" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 18, section 1030. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Consumer. new text end new text begin "Consumer" means an individual who purchases or leases an Internet-enabled device for personal, family, or household purposes. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Contemporary community standards. new text end new text begin "Contemporary community standards" means the customary limits of candor and decency in this state at or near the time of an alleged violation of sections 609.285 to 609.2857. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Data communications device. new text end new text begin "Data communications device" means an electronic device that receives electronic information from one source and transmits or routes it to another, including but not limited to a bridge, router, switch, or gateway. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Filter. new text end new text begin "Filter" means a digital blocking capability, hardware, or software that restricts or blocks Internet access to websites, e-mail, chat, or other Internet-based communications based on category, site, or content, and also means a digital blinder rack that can be deactivated by a retailer upon the satisfaction of certain nominal conditions. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Human trafficking. new text end new text begin "Human trafficking" means sex trafficking as defined in section 609.321, subdivision 7a, and labor trafficking as defined in section 609.281, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Internet. new text end new text begin "Internet" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 31, section 5362. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Internet-enabled device. new text end new text begin "Internet-enabled device" means a cellular telephone, computer, data communications device, or other product manufactured, distributed, or sold in this state that provides Internet access or plays a material role in distributing content on the Internet. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Internet service provider. new text end new text begin "Internet service provider" means a person engaged in the business of providing a computer and communications facility through which a consumer may obtain access to the Internet. The term does not include a common carrier if it provides only telecommunications service. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Material. new text end new text begin "Material" has the meaning given in section 617.241, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Minor. new text end new text begin "Minor" means a person under the age of 18 years. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Nude. new text end new text begin "Nude" means: new text end new text begin (1) entirely unclothed; or new text end new text begin (2) clothed in a manner that exposes to public view, at any time, the bare female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola, human genitals, pubic region, or buttocks, even if partially covered by opaque material or completely covered by translucent material such as swimsuits, lingerie, or latex covering. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Obscene. new text end new text begin "Obscene" has the meaning given in section 617.241, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), and includes but is not limited to websites that: new text end new text begin (1) are known to facilitate human trafficking, escort services, or prostitution; and new text end new text begin (2) display or depict images that are harmful to minors or that constitute sadomasochistic abuse, sexual excitement, sexual conduct, or revenge pornography. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Personal identification information. new text end new text begin "Personal identification information" means any information that identifies a person, including an individual's photograph, Social Security number, driver's license number, name, email address, mailing address, or telephone number. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Prostitution. new text end new text begin "Prostitution" has the meaning given in section 609.321, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Revenge pornography. new text end new text begin "Revenge pornography" is an offense under section 617.261 and means the distribution of sexually explicit images or videos of an individual without the individual's permission. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Retailer. new text end new text begin "Retailer" means any person who regularly engages in the manufacturing, sale, offer for sale, or lease of Internet-enabled devices or services in this state that make content accessible on the Internet. The term includes Internet service providers and suppliers and manufacturers of Internet-enabled devices that materially play a role in distributing content on the Internet or that make content accessible that are subject to the jurisdiction of this state. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Sadomasochistic abuse. new text end new text begin "Sadomasochistic abuse" means: new text end new text begin (1) flagellation or torture, real or simulated, for the purpose of real or simulated sexual stimulation or gratification, by or upon a person; or new text end new text begin (2) the condition, real or simulated, of being fettered, bound, or otherwise physically restrained for sexual stimulation or gratification of a person. new text end new text begin Subd. 23. new text end new text begin Sexual conduct. new text end new text begin "Sexual conduct" has the meaning given in section 617.292, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Sexual excitement. new text end new text begin "Sexual excitement" means the condition, real or simulated, of human male or female genitals in a state of real or simulated overt sexual stimulation or arousal. new text end new text begin Subd. 25. new text end new text begin Social media website. new text end new text begin "Social media website" means an Internet website or application that enables users to communicate with each other by posting information, comments, messages, or images and that meets all of the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) is open to the public; new text end new text begin (2) has more than 75,000,000 subscribers; new text end new text begin (3) from its inception, has not been specifically affiliated with any one religion or political party; and new text end new text begin (4) provides a means for the website's users to report obscene materials and has in place procedures for evaluating those reports and removing obscene material. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [609.2852] INTERNET-ENABLED DEVICE FILTER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Active filter. new text end new text begin (a) A retailer that manufactures, sells, offers for sale, leases, or distributes an Internet-enabled device shall ensure that the product is equipped with an active and operating filter prior to sale that blocks, by default, websites that: new text end new text begin (1) are known to facilitate human trafficking or prostitution; and new text end new text begin (2) display child pornography, revenge pornography, or obscene material harmful to minors. new text end new text begin (b) A retailer that manufactures, sells, offers for sale, leases, or distributes an Internet-enabled device shall: new text end new text begin (1) make reasonable and ongoing efforts to ensure that a product's filter functions properly; new text end new text begin (2) establish a reporting mechanism, including but not limited to a website or call center, to allow a consumer to report unblocked websites displaying content described in paragraph (a), clause (1), or to report blocked websites that are not displaying content described in paragraph (a), clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) report child pornography received through the reporting mechanism to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children's CyberTipline in accordance with United States Code, title 18, section 2258A; and new text end new text begin (4) not block access to websites that: new text end new text begin (i) are social media websites that provide a means for the website's users to report obscene materials and have in place procedures for evaluating those reports and removing obscene material; new text end new text begin (ii) serve primarily as a search engine; or new text end new text begin (iii) display complete movies that meet the qualifications for a "G," "PG," "PG-13," or "R" rating by the Classification and Ratings Administration, as those qualifications existed on September 1, 2020. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Deactivated filter. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided under paragraph (b), a retailer may not provide to a consumer methods, source code, or other operating instructions for deactivating a product's filter. new text end new text begin (b) A retailer of an Internet-enabled device shall deactivate a product's filter after a consumer: new text end new text begin (1) requests that the capability be disabled; new text end new text begin (2) presents personal identification information to verify that the consumer is 18 years of age or older; new text end new text begin (3) acknowledges receiving a warning regarding the potential danger of deactivating the filter; and new text end new text begin (4) pays a onetime $20 filter deactivation fee to be remitted quarterly to the commissioner of public safety for deposit in the human trafficking and child exploitation prevention grant account under section 609.2857. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin (a) The filter deactivation fee in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (4), is not content-based but collected and remitted to the commissioner of public safety to help the state bear the costs of upholding community standards of decency and of combating sex-related offenses and is to be used according to section 609.2857. The commissioner shall prescribe the administration, payment, collection, and enforcement of the fee under subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (4). The commissioner may annually adjust the onetime fee to account for inflation. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a retailer from charging a reasonable separate fee to deactivate a product's filter, which it may retain for profit. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Deactivation warning. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety shall prepare and make available to retailers a form that includes all content that must be in the warning described in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (3). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Data privacy; records. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a retailer of an Internet-enabled device to create a database or registry that contains the names of personal identification information of adults who knowingly choose to deactivate a product's filter. A retailer of an Internet-enabled device shall take due care to protect the privacy rights of adult consumers under this section and shall not disclose the names or personal identification information of an adult consumer who decided to deactivate a product's filter. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [609.2853] CIVIL ACTION. new text end new text begin (a) Pursuant to section 609.2852, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (2), if the filter blocks a website that is not displaying content described in section 609.2852, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), and the block is reported to a call center or reporting mechanism, the website shall be unblocked no later than five business days after the block is first reported. A consumer may seek judicial relief to unblock a website that was wrongfully blocked by the filter. The prevailing party in a civil litigation may seek attorney fees, costs, and other forms of relief. new text end new text begin (b) Pursuant to section 609.2852, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (2), if a retailer of an Internet-enabled device is unresponsive to a report of a website displaying content described in section 609.2852, subdivision 1, that has breached the filter, the attorney general or a consumer may file a civil suit. The attorney general or a consumer may seek damages of up to $500 for each website that was reported but not subsequently blocked. The prevailing party in the civil action may seek attorney fees, costs, and other forms of relief. new text end new text begin (c) A retailer that does not comply with the duties described in paragraphs (a) and (b) has engaged in an unfair, deceptive, or unconscionable act in violation of section 325F.69 and is subject to the remedies in section 325F.70. new text end new text begin (d) It shall be an affirmative defense in a civil action to a charge of violating this section that the dissemination of the content described in section 609.2852, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), was limited to institutions or organizations having scientific, educational, or other similar justifications for displaying the material. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [609.2854] CRIME. new text end new text begin (a) A retailer of an Internet-enabled device is guilty of an offense if the retailer knowingly: new text end new text begin (1) sells an internet-enabled device without activated blocking capability that at least makes an attempt to block, by default, websites that display content described in section 609.2852, subdivision 1, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (2) violates section 609.2852, subdivision 2, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (3) fails to comply with the requirements of section 609.2852, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), before deactivating the filter; or new text end new text begin (4) discloses to a third party the name or the personal identification information of an adult consumer who has elected to deactivate a product's filter in violation of section 609.2852, subdivision 5, without a court order directing otherwise. new text end new text begin (b) A retailer shall be fined not more than $1,000 for a first offense and not more than $2,500 for any subsequent offense. new text end new text begin (c) A retailer that commits an offense under paragraph (a) and has two prior convictions under paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 90 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $40,000, or both. new text end new text begin (d) A retailer that commits an offense under paragraph (a) has engaged in an unfair, deceptive, or unconscionable act in violation of section 325F.70 and is subject to the penalties for violating that section. new text end new text begin (e) Only the attorney general or a county attorney shall enforce this section. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [609.2855] SALE OF DEVICE. new text end new text begin (a) Sections 609.2851 to 609.2857 shall not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) an occasional sale of an Internet-enabled device by a person who is not regularly engaged in the trade business of selling Internet-enabled devices; new text end new text begin (2) products produced or sold before the effective date of this act; and new text end new text begin (3) independent third-party routers that are not affiliated with an Internet service provider. new text end new text begin (b) Sections 609.2851 to 609.2857 do not apply to a retailer of an Internet-enabled device that is not subject to the jurisdiction of this state. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [609.2856] ADULT ENTERTAINMENT ESTABLISHMENT. new text end new text begin (a) A $5 admission fee is imposed for each entry by each customer admitted to an adult entertainment establishment to be remitted quarterly to the commissioner of public safety for deposit in the human trafficking and child exploitation prevention grant account under section 609.2857. The commissioner shall prescribe the method of administration, payment, collection, and enforcement of the fee imposed by this section. new text end new text begin (b) The admission fee is not content-based but imposed and remitted to the state to offset secondary harmful effects and to help the state uphold community standards of decency and to combat sex-related crimes and is to be used as described under section 609.2857, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (c) The admission fee is in addition to all other taxes imposed on the business that offers adult entertainment. new text end new text begin (d) An adult entertainment establishment shall record daily in the manner required by the commissioner of public safety the number of customers admitted to the business. The business shall maintain the records for the time period required by the commissioner and make the records available only for inspection and audit on request by the commissioner. The records shall not contain the names or personal information of any of the customers. new text end new text begin (e) This section does not require an adult entertainment establishment to impose a tax on a customer of the business. The business has the discretion to determine the manner in which the business derives the money required to pay the tax imposed under this section. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [609.2857] HUMAN TRAFFICKING AND CHILD EXPLOITATION GRANT ACCOUNT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Creation. new text end new text begin (a) The human trafficking and child exploitation grant account is established in the special revenue fund. The account shall be administered by the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall credit to the account interest and earnings from account investments. new text end new text begin (c) Money in the human trafficking and child exploitation account shall be expended only upon appropriation and only in a manner to carry out the purposes in sections 609.2851 to 609.2857. Money in the account at the close of the fiscal year shall remain in the account and shall not revert to the general fund. new text end new text begin (d) "Nongovernment group" means a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 having as a primary purpose ending sexual violence in this state, for programs for the prevention of sexual violence, outreach programs, and technical assistance to and support of youth and rape crisis centers working to prevent sexual violence. Nongovernment group also includes individuals and any group that is doing anything to uphold community standards of decency. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of the account is: new text end new text begin (1) to promote the development throughout the state of locally based and supported nonprofit programs for the survivors of sexual-related offenses and to support the quality of services provided; new text end new text begin (2) to empower any government and nongovernment groups working to uphold community standards of decency, protect children, strengthen families, or to develop, expand, or prevent or offset the costs of sex-related offenses, especially human trafficking and child exploitation; and new text end new text begin (3) not to promote a culture of perpetual victimhood but to maximize human flourishing and to protect the public's safety, health, and welfare. new text end new text begin This subdivision shall be interpreted broadly to best meet the evolving needs of the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Contents of account. new text end new text begin The account shall consist of: new text end new text begin (1) deactivation fees collected by the commissioner from retailers of Internet-enabled devices under section 609.2852, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (4); new text end new text begin (2) admission fees collected by the commissioner from adult entertainment establishments under section 609.2856; and new text end new text begin (3) any other appropriations, gifts, grants, donations, and bequests. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of account. new text end new text begin (a) Money deposited in the account may be used only by: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of public safety for grants to government and nongovernment entities and individuals that are working to uphold community standards of decency, to protect children, to strengthen families, or to develop, expand, or strengthen programs for victims of human trafficking or child exploitation, including providing grants for: new text end new text begin (i) any costs associated with the trafficking study established under section 299A.785 and the costs of trafficking victim assistance established under 299A.795; new text end new text begin (ii) the needs of the director of child sex trafficking prevention established by the commissioner of health under section 145.4716; new text end new text begin (iii) programs established under sections 145.4716 to 145.4718; 609.3241, paragraph (c), clause (3); and 609.5315, subdivision 5c, clause (3); new text end new text begin (iv) human trafficking task forces, coalitions, and other similarly situated organizations; new text end new text begin (v) victim compensation and the expenses of Safe Harbor established under section 145.4716; new text end new text begin (vi) services to help women with substance abuse problems; new text end new text begin (vii) counselors and victim advocates who are trained to assist victims of domestic violence and sexual abuse; new text end new text begin (viii) shelters for women, particularly those who have been exposed to prostitution or sex trafficking; new text end new text begin (ix) research-based organizations studying human trafficking; new text end new text begin (x) faith-based organizations working to uphold community standards of decency and assisting victims of human trafficking or other sex offenses; new text end new text begin (xi) child advocacy centers; new text end new text begin (xii) organizations that provide legal advocacy to abused, neglected, and at-risk children; new text end new text begin (xiii) physical and mental health services; new text end new text begin (xiv) temporary and permanent housing placement; new text end new text begin (xv) employment, placement, education, and training; new text end new text begin (xvi) independent school districts; new text end new text begin (xvii) family counseling and therapy; new text end new text begin (xviii) law enforcement; new text end new text begin (xix) musical, writing, design, cinematic, or pictorial creative art projects that promote decency; new text end new text begin (xx) regional nonprofit providers of civil legal services to provide legal assistance for sexual assault victims; new text end new text begin (xxi) grants to support technology in rape crisis centers; new text end new text begin (xxii) sexual violence awareness and prevention campaigns; and new text end new text begin (xxiii) scholarships for students demonstrating outstanding character or leadership skills; and new text end new text begin (2) any other state agency or organization for the purpose of conducting human trafficking enforcement programs or to uphold community standards of decency. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety shall not spend more than ten percent of the available funds on the administration of the grant program. new text end new text begin (c) Any balance in the account remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee shall evaluate activities conducted under this section each year and, on or before February 15, submit an annual report containing the evaluation to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human trafficking and child exploitation. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of filter deactivation fees received under section 609.2852, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (4); new text end new text begin (2) the amount of admission fees received under section 609.2856, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (3) the manner in which the funds in the account maintained under subdivision 4 were distributed; and new text end new text begin (4) the manner in which each entity receiving a grant under subdivision 4 used the grant money. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Rulemaking authority. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety may adopt rules under chapter 14 to: new text end new text begin (1) determine eligibility requirements for any grant awarded under this section; new text end new text begin (2) require a grant recipient to offer minimum services for a period of time before receiving a grant and to continue to offer minimum services during the grant period; and new text end new text begin (3) require a grant recipient to submit financial and programmatic reports. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective only from and after the passage, approval, ratification, and adoption by four other states of similar legislation. Within ten days of the date that the four states adopt legislation similar to this act, the secretary of state shall notify the governor, the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, and the revisor of statutes of the effective date of this act. new text end